en: Dried split peas
fr: Pois cassés secs
hr: Sušeni sitni grašak
nl: Spliterwten

en: Cooked split peas
fr: Pois cassés cuits

en: Bambara groundnuts, Bambara beans
es: Bambara
fr: Pois bambara, Pois de terre
hr: Bambara kikiriki
ja: バンバラマメ
la: Vigna subterranea

en: Black grams, Urad bean, Black matpe bean, Urad Dal
es: Lenteja negra, Lenteja mungo, Urd
fr: Haricots urd, Urd
hr: Crne grame
la: Vigna mungo, Phaseolus mungo
nl: Uradbonen

en: Lima beans
ca: garrofó, fesol de la peladilla, mongeta de Lima
da: limabønne, månebønne, sukkerbønne
de: Limabohne, Mondbohne
el: φασόλι της Lima, φασόλια Lima
eo: limofazeolo
es: Garrofones, Garrofón, Habones, Judías de Lima, Habas de Lima
eu: limako babarruna
fa: لوبیای عروس
fi: voipapu, limanpapu, valkoinen voipapu
fr: Haricots de Lima
ga: pónaire mhór
hr: Lima grah
ht: pwachouk
id: kacang kratok, kacang jawa, kekara
it: Fagioli di Lima
ja: ライマメ
ko: 리마콩
la: Phaseolus lunatus
ml: ബട്ടർ ബീൻസ്
ms: kacang serinding, kacang keratuk, kacang kratok, kacang cina
nb: limabønne, limabønner
nl: Limabonen, limaboon, Indische maanboon, wilgenbladboon, olifantsboon
pl: fasola półksiężycowata
pt: feijão-de-lima
ru: фасоль луновидная, Фасо́ль лунообра́зная, фасоль ли́мская, фасоль лу́нная
sr: лима пасуљ, lima pasulj
su: roay, kacang jawa, kekara
sv: limaböna, smörböna, smörbönor
sw: mfiwi
tl: patani
vi: dâu ngu
zh: 棉豆

en: Butter beans, Yellow beans
bg: Маслен боб
fr: Haricots beurre

en: Chickpeas, Chana dal, Split Bengal gram
bg: Нахут
ca: Cigrons
da: Kikærter
de: Kichererbsen, Kichererbse
es: Garbanzos
fi: kikherneet
fr: Pois chiches
hr: slanutak
it: Ceci
ja: ヒヨコマメ
la: Cicer arietinum
lt: Avinžirniai
nl: Kikkererwten
pl: Ciecierzyca
pt: Grão-de-bico
ru: Нут
tr: Nohut

en: Dried chickpeas, Dried chick peas
bg: Суров нахут
da: Tørrede kikærter
fr: Pois chiches secs
hr: Sušeni slanutak
nl: Gedroogde kikkererwten
pl: Ciecierzyca suszona

en: Cooked chick peas
bg: Сварен нахут
da: Kokte kikærter
fr: Pois chiche cuits
hr: Kuhani slanutak
pl: Ciecierzyca gotowana

en: Black chickpeas
da: Sorte kikærter

en: Desi chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de tipo Desi
fr: Pois chiches de type Desi
hr: Desi slanutak
la: Cicer arietinum var. fuscum, Cicer arietinum var. microcarpum

en: Kabuli chickpeas, Garbanzo beans, Garbanzo
es: Garbanzos de tipo Kabuli
fr: Pois chiches de type Kabuli
hr: Kabuli slanutak
la: Cicer arietinum var. macrocarpum

en: Pedrosillano chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de tipo Pedrosillano, Garbanzo Pedrosillano

en: Castellano chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de tipo Castellano, Garbanzo Castellano
fr: Pois chiches Castellano
hr: Castellano slanutak

en: Fuentesaúco chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de Fuentesaúco

en: Lechoso chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de tipo Lechoso, Garbanzos de tipo Blanco lechoso, Garbanzo Lechoso, Garbanzo Lechoso Andaluz

en: Escacena chickpeas
es: Garbanzos de Escacena

en: Common beans, String beans, Rajma, Rajmah
ca: Fesols
de: Gartenbohnen, Fisolen, Strankerl, Stangenbohnen
es: Alubias, Judías, Frijoles, Porotos, Fabas, Fabes
fi: pavut
hr: grah
hu: Babok
it: Fagioli
ja: インゲンマメ, インゲン豆, いんげん豆
la: Phaseolus vulgaris
lt: Pupelės
nl: Gewone bonen
pt: Feijões comuns

en: Black beans
bg: Черен боб
da: Sorte bønner
de: Schwarze Bohnen
es: Alubias negras, Judías negras
fi: Mustapavut
fr: Haricots noirs
hr: Crni grah
it: Fagioli neri
lt: Juodos pupelės
nl: Zwarte bonen
pl: Fasola czarna
sv: Svarta bönor

en: Canned black beans
fr: Haricots noirs en conserve
hr: Konzervirani crni grah
pl: Fasola czarna w puszce